Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 2 ADMINISTRATION
42-1-224. Criminal history check.

The department may submit fingerprints of an employee or prospective employee to the Colorado bureau of investigation to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history record check if the employee's duties do or will provide them with access to Colorado driver's licenses and identification cards issued pursuant to article 2 of this title 42 or personal identifying information collected or stored by the department in order to issue driver's licenses or identification cards. The department of revenue shall require all such employees hired on or after April 15, 2010, to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history record check prior to performing their official duties, and shall require all such employees hired before April 15, 2010, to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history record check by July 1, 2011. The department may use this information to make employment decisions concerning such employees. Upon receipt of fingerprints and payment for the costs, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall conduct a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The department shall be the authorized agency to receive information regarding the result of the national criminal history record check. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall charge the department a fee for record checks conducted pursuant to this section. The Colorado bureau of investigation shall set such fee at a level sufficient to cover the direct and indirect costs of processing requests made pursuant to this section. Money collected by the bureau pursuant to this section is subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the administration of this section.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of a person performed pursuant to this section reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the department shall require the person to submit to a name-based criminal history record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d). The department shall pay the costs associated with a name-based criminal history record check.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1011), ch. 110, p. 367, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 558, § 51, effective April 18.

42-1-225. Commercial vehicle enterprise tax fund - creation.

The commercial vehicle enterprise tax fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of moneys collected and transmitted to the fund pursuant to section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(II). The general assembly shall annually appropriate the moneys in the fund to cover the actual cost of administering sections 39-26-113.5 and 39-30-104 (1)(b), C.R.S. Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department of revenue for the payment of sales and use tax refunds pursuant to section 39-26-113.5, C.R.S. After receiving the statement pursuant to section 39-30-104 (1)(b)(VI), C.R.S., the state treasurer shall credit the total cost of the amount of the tax credits stated therein to the general fund. Any moneys remaining in the commercial vehicle enterprise tax fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund.

On July 1, 2011, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall allocate one-third of the fund balance, not including the amount appropriated to cover the actual cost of administering sections 39-26-113.5 and 39-30-104 (1)(b), C.R.S., to make the sales tax refunds granted in section 39-26-113.5, C.R.S.

On July 1, 2011, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall allocate two-thirds of the fund balance, not including the amount appropriated to cover the actual cost of administering sections 39-26-113.5 and 39-30-104 (1)(b), C.R.S., to offset the income tax credit granted in section 39-30-104 (1)(b), C.R.S. By January 1, 2012, the department shall notify the Colorado economic development commission created in section 24-46-102, C.R.S., of the amount allocated for such purposes.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1285), ch. 423, p. 2187, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-041), ch. 165, p. 576, § 1, effective May 9.

42-1-226. Disabled parking education and enforcement fund - created.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the disabled parking education and enforcement fund, which consists of money collected pursuant to this section and section 42-4-1208 (6) and (7). The general assembly shall appropriate the money in the fund for the purposes specified in sections 42-3-204 and 42-4-1208. Unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund. The department may accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. All private and public funds received through gifts, grants, or donations must be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the fund.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, p. 1917, § 1, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1392), ch. 132, p. 575, § 5, effective June 26.

42-1-227. Disabled parking education program. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1019), ch. 400, p. 1917, § 1, effective January 1, 2011.

L. 2014:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 14-1029), ch. 252, p. 990, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended and (2) added, (HB 18-1364), ch. 351, p. 2083, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (HB 20-1392), ch. 132, p. 575, § 2, effective June 26.

42-1-228. Revocation hearings - right of driver to challenge validity of initial traffic stop.

In any administrative proceeding for a revocation of a driver's license pursuant to article 2 of this title, where the hearing officer is engaged in finding facts and applying law for an incident or offense reported directly to the department by a law enforcement officer, and where the revocation was not triggered in whole or in part by a record of a conviction, the driver may challenge the validity of the law enforcement officer's initial contact with the driver and subsequent arrest of the driver. If a driver so challenges the validity of the law enforcement officer's initial contact, and the evidence does not establish that the initial contact or arrest was constitutionally and statutorily valid, the driver is not subject to license revocation.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1077), ch. 196, p. 798, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1073), ch. 92, p. 263, § 2, effective August 5.

42-1-229. Report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-087), ch. 306, p. 1297, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(2) added, (HB 17-1137), ch. 45, p. 135, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 2, 2018. (See

L. 2017, p. 135

.)

42-1-230. Exceptions processing - rules.

Beginning September 1, 2014, the department of revenue shall provide the opportunity for exceptions processing in person at a minimum of four regional offices that are actually operated by the department of revenue and that issue driver's licenses. The department shall promulgate rules to implement exceptions processing for documents issued under parts 1, 2, 3, and 5 of article 2 of this title. The department shall not use exceptions processing for noncitizens to establish lawful status in the United States.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1543, § 5, effective June 5.

42-1-231. Kiosk program.

An authorized agent may conduct a kiosk program using a private provider to provide services concerning any function the authorized agent performs under article 2, 3, or 6 of this title 42, not including part 5 of article 2 of this title 42. The kiosk program may include mobile telephone and web solutions to provide services. An authorized agent shall:

Allow a resident in the county's jurisdiction to use a kiosk in another county for any purpose authorized under this section; and

Allow a resident of another county to use a kiosk in the county's jurisdiction for any purpose authorized under this section.

The authorized agent may use a competitive bid process to select the private provider.

The authorized agent may assess a convenience fee, as negotiated between the authorized agent and the private provider, for the services provided in the kiosk program. The authorized agent may authorize the private provider to retain a portion or all of the convenience fee.

The department may accept financial assistance from an authorized agent or a private party to implement this program, so long as the financial assistance is directly related to the kiosk program and does not stipulate a condition that conflicts with state law.

Repealed.

The department shall transfer any money accepted under this subsection (3) to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211. The department shall use any money accepted under this subsection (3) to implement this section.

Repealed.

To implement this program, the authorized agent and the department shall coordinate with each other to ensure that the program will operate successfully and in accordance with state law.

Any private provider participating in the kiosk program is not excluded from any competitive bid process associated with motor vehicle registration, issuing certificates of title, or issuing driver's licenses.

To be qualified to be a private provider, a person must:

Meet the security requirements established by rule by the office of information technology; and

Operate in accordance with a service-level agreement with the authorized agent.

The private provider shall not retain the information obtained from a transaction authorized under this section for any purpose other than the purposes of this section and as required in the service-level agreement with the authorized agent.

The private provider shall not transfer to another person or use or copy information obtained from a transaction authorized under this section for any purpose other than the purposes of this section and as required in the service-level agreement with the authorized agent.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-138), ch. 162, p. 513, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 366, § 8, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(3)(b)(II) and (3)(c)(II) amended, (SB 18-253), ch. 293, p. 1799, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2020:

(1), (2)(b), (3)(a), (4), and (5) amended and (6) and (7) added, (SB 20-035), ch. 240, p. 1160, § 1, effective July 6.

42-1-232. Third-party VIN inspection program - rules - definitions.

For the purposes of this section:

"Chief" means the chief of the Colorado state patrol.

"Convicted" means a conviction of, or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to, a violation of the law.

"Permit" means authority for an organization to employ people to verify information, including a VIN, that may be required to register a commercial vehicle under article 3 of this title 42 or to be issued a certificate of title under article 6 of this title 42.

"VIN" means vehicle identification number.

The chief shall create a program that authorizes a transportation association or organization to verify commercial vehicle information, including a VIN, as a vehicle-related entity if the transportation association or organization demonstrates to the satisfaction of the chief that it and any individuals it may employ to verify information meet the requirements of this section and any rules promulgated to implement this section. Upon determining that a transportation association or organization meets the requirements of this section and any rules promulgated to implement this section, the chief may issue a permit to the applicant.

To be issued a permit to verify information, including a VIN, as a vehicle-related entity, an applicant must:

Employ verifiers who demonstrate knowledge of the process and standards and who have not been convicted of violating article 4 of title 18 within the last ten years;

Submit the name, background, experience, location of operation, contact information, and any other information required by the chief of each employed verifier;

Furnish evidence of a savings account or deposit in a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101 or a surety bond that:

Holds harmless any person who suffers loss or damage arising from the issuance of a certificate of title that included a verification done by the permit holder; and

Is in the amount of at least ten thousand dollars.

A vehicle-related entity shall not employ a verifier until the chief has approved the verifier. The permit holder shall submit to the chief the name, background, experience, location of operation, contact information, and any other information required by the chief of each verifier. Within seven days after ceasing to employ a verifier, the vehicle-related entity shall notify the chief that the individual no longer verifies information for the vehicle-related entity.

A vehicle-related entity shall not charge more than twenty-five dollars per transaction to verify information.

The chief may deny or cancel a permit for:

Failing to comply with this section;

Failing to maintain in full force the savings account, deposit in a certificate of deposit, or surety bond required by subsection (3) of this section;

Misrepresentations in applying for a permit;

Being convicted under, or employing a verifier who is convicted under, article 4 of title 18;

Incompetence or failing to adequately verify information, including a VIN, as a vehicle-related entity.

The chief may promulgate rules reasonably necessary to implement this section, including establishing application procedures and any required forms and establishing procedures, in compliance with article 4 of title 24, for canceling a permit. The chief may summarily suspend a permit for up to sixty days pending a hearing to cancel a permit if the chief determines that irreparable harm may occur if the permit holder continues to verify information, including a VIN, as a vehicle-related entity.

For the purposes of verifying information in accordance with articles 1 to 5 of this title 42, a permit holder is a vehicle-related entity.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1105), ch. 44, p. 130, § 4, effective March 16.

L. 2020:

Entire section RC&RE, (SB 20-011), ch. 7, p. 11, § 1, effective March 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective January 1, 2020. (See

L. 2017, p. 130

.) However, the entire section was recreated March 5, 2020.

42-1-233. Expedited registration program - private vendor providing services to register Class A commercial vehicles - rules.

Beginning January 1, 2019, the department shall create and implement an expedited registration program. The expedited registration program authorizes private providers to register commercial vehicles that are classified as Class A personal property in section 42-3-106. This includes collecting and remitting the taxes and fees for the registration to the department.

The department shall promulgate rules authorizing a private provider to participate in the expedited registration program if the provider:

Has been approved by the department;

Uses software that is approved by the department to calculate the amount of taxes and fees imposed in this title 42 and that is updated regularly to take into account any changes to the taxes and fees imposed in this title 42; and

Procures and files with the department evidence of any of the following in an amount determined by rule by the department:

A savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101; or

A bond issued by a licensed corporate surety.

The financial commitment required in subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section must provide for the reimbursement of any damages caused to the state of Colorado, a political subdivision of Colorado, or the owner of personal property registered through the expedited registration program by an act or omission of the private provider.

A private provider may collect and retain a convenience fee for the services provided in the expedited registration program.

The department may accept financial assistance from a private party to implement the expedited registration program if the financial assistance is directly related to the expedited registration program and is not conditional upon an act or circumstance that conflicts with state law.

The department shall transfer any money accepted under this subsection (3) to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account created in section 42-1-211 (2)(b)(I).

The department shall use any money accepted under this subsection (3) to implement this section.

To implement the expedited registration program, the department shall ensure that the expedited registration program:

Operates efficiently;

Provides additional services or increases the speed or quality of services at an overall cost savings to the state; and

Registers commercial vehicles and collects and remits taxes and fees in compliance with state law.

To implement this section, the department may promulgate rules in addition to the rules required under subsection (2)(a) of this section and may enter into contracts with private providers.

Subject to article 4 of title 24, the department may approve, deny approval, suspend approval, or revoke approval of a private provider who:

Violates the law in the provision of services approved under this section;

Makes a material misstatement to the department or any county in seeking approval to provide expedited registration services;

Fails to comply with this section or any rules promulgated under this section; or

Fails to satisfactorily provide expedited registration services or to collect or remit appropriate taxes and fees.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1042), ch. 375, p. 2277, § 1, effective August 8.

42-1-234. Electronic vehicle registration and titling - electronic transmission of vehicle lien information - authority - rules - cash fund - gifts, grants, and donations.

The department may establish a system to allow the electronic transmission of registration, lien, and titling information for motor vehicles, off-highway vehicles, or special mobile machinery. Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department may adopt rules necessary for the implementation of this section, including rules to allow the department to:

Maintain titling information electronically and to produce paper titles only upon request of a party;

Accept electronic signatures on any documents, including title transfers, odometer disclosures, and powers of attorney, required to issue a certificate of title to a new owner;

Eliminate any notarization requirements for document signatures;

Allow all parties to electronically file and release lien information;

Authorize approved third-party providers to:

Electronically process registration, lien, and titling information and transmit the information to the department as authorized by the department;

Order, manage, and distribute the department's license plate inventory to a client; and

Access, print, and distribute the department's registration information to a client on demand.

The department's approval of a third-party provider to register a vehicle or special mobile machinery, file or release liens, or issue any type of certificate of title must be evidenced by an agreement between the department and the third-party provider.

In registering a vehicle or special mobile machinery, filing or releasing liens, or issuing any type of certificate of title, the third-party provider is acting as an agent of the department. The third-party provider shall collect and remit to the department all taxes and fees imposed by law to issue any type of certificate of title, file or release a lien, or to register the vehicle or special mobile machinery.

A third-party provider may charge its clients a fee for each electronic registration transaction, lien transaction, or titling transaction. The client may charge a consumer the fee the client paid to the third-party provider if the fee charged to the consumer does not exceed the fee charged to the client.

The department shall ensure that the addresses of program participants under part 21 of article 30 of title 24 are not released to third-party providers or the clients of third-party providers.

The department is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources, including from third-party providers, for the purposes of this section; except that the department may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this section or any other law of the state. The department shall ensure that any funds contributed to the department for the implementation of the system for the electronic transmission of registration, lien, and titling information for motor vehicles, off-highway vehicles, and special mobile machinery are tracked separately and used only for the implementation of the system.

The department need not promulgate rules, under subsection (1) of this section, that implement electronic transactions until the department receives adequate gifts, grants, or donations to implement the promulgated rules. The department may, upon receiving adequate gifts, grants, or donations, phase in implementation of this section as reasonable. The department shall not use money from the general fund to implement this section.

This subsection (3) does not affect any rules promulgated, or appropriations made, before July 1, 2019.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added with relocations, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1809, § 4, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-3-113.5 as it existed prior to 2019.

42-1-235. Electronic records, documents, and signatures.

A record covered by article 3 of this title 42, including a signature on the record or document, may not be denied legal effect, validity, or enforceability solely because it is in the form of an electronic record, document, or signature. Except as otherwise provided in article 3 of this title 42, if a rule of law requires a record to be in writing or provides consequences if it is not, an electronic record satisfies that rule of law. This section applies to and in a court of law. For a record, document, or signature to be legally effective, valid, or enforceable, a person need not obtain a written power of attorney solely because the record, document, or signature is in an electronic form.

Source: L. 2018:

Entire section added with relocations, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1811, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; entire section amended, (SB 18-255), ch. 405, p. 2387, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.